tests/morphophonology/new.yaml
Config: 
  hfst: 
    App:  hfst-lookup
    Gen:  tat.autogen.hfst
    Morph:  tat.automorf.hfst

Tests: 

  "selimcan.org": 
     исәнмесез<ij> : исәнмесез

  "[twol] si":
    зур<adj><subst><px3sp><nom><adj><subst><px3sp><nom> : зурысы
    зур<adj><subst><px3sp><nom> : зуры
    
  "[twol] п ":
    гаеп<n><px3sp><nom> : гаебе

  "[twol] к ":
    аръяк<n><px3sp><nom> : аръягы

  "[twol] %{ь%} ":
    фаҗига<n><pl><nom> : фаҗигаләр
